Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1861.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1550 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended to read:Section 1550. Firefighter and Emergency [Service] Medical Services Training.--(a) Beginning with the 2003-2004 school year and each school year thereafter, a school district may offer firefighter and emergency [service] medical services training as credit-earning courses to students of the age of sixteen (16) years or older who are bona fide members of a fire company or an emergency medical services agency. Such courses may include:1234567891011121314151617181920 (1) Training as a Firefighter I from the National Board on Fire Service Professional Qualifications.(2) Training as an emergency medical technician [pursuant to the act of July 3, 1985 (P.L.164, No.45), known as the "Emergency Medical Services Act."] in accordance with 35 Pa.C.S. Ch. 81 (relating to emergency medical services system).(b) A school district that offers firefighter and emergency [service] medical services training as credit-earning courses [shall] may provide transportation to [and supervision during] any firefighter and emergency [service] medical services training program that takes place off school grounds. A school district that offers firefighter and emergency medical services training as credit-earning courses shall provide supervision during any firefighter and emergency medical services training program that takes place off school grounds. Supervision of training shall be conducted as [a cooperative education] an out-of-school program in accordance with the provisions of 22 Pa. Code § 11.28 (relating to out-of-school programs and part-time employment).(c) A school district shall not be responsible for the costs of course fees and related materials associated with the provisions of this section.(d) The following words and phrases when used in this section shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Emergency medical services agency." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 8103 (relating to definitions)."Fire company." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 7802 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1861PN2310 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930